Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 5.3 Protection of Used Motor Vehicle Purchasers

31-5.3-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 478, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 222, § 1, effective June 25, 1987.

31-5.3-2.
Deceptive trade practice.

A dealer’s failure to comply with §

31-38-1

as to the inspection of used motor vehicles, shall constitute a deceptive trade practice under the terms of chapter 13.1 of title 6. All of the public and private remedies provided for in chapter 13.1 of title 6 shall be available to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 478, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 324, § 13.